raw/lt-LT_raw.aff
FLAG num
SFX 8373 Y 2
SFX 8373 irsti irto/17069,9999 .	is:PsForm
SFX 8373 irstis irtosi/17069,9999 .	is:PsForm

SFX 8374 Y 2
SFX 8374 irsti irto/17134,9999 .	is:PsForm
SFX 8374 irstis irtosi/17134,9999 .	is:PsForm

SFX 8375 Y 2
SFX 8375 irsti irto/17133,9999 .	is:PsForm
SFX 8375 irstis irtosi/17133,9999 .	is:PsForm

SFX 8379 Y 2
SFX 8379 ėkšti ėkšti/13314,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8379 ėkštis ėkštis/13314,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8380 Y 2
SFX 8380 ėkšti ėkšti/13941,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8380 ėkštis ėkštis/13941,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8381 Y 2
SFX 8381 ėkšti ėkšti/13486,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8381 ėkštis ėkštis/13486,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8382 Y 2
SFX 8382 ėkšti ėkšti/13497,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8382 ėkštis ėkštis/13497,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8383 Y 2
SFX 8383 ėkšti ėkšti/13496,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8383 ėkštis ėkštis/13496,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8384 Y 2
SFX 8384 ėkšti ėkšti/13406,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8384 ėkštis ėkštis/13406,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8385 Y 2
SFX 8385 ėkšti ėkšti/13415,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8385 ėkštis ėkštis/13415,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8386 Y 2
SFX 8386 ėkšti ėkšti/13414,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8386 ėkštis ėkštis/13414,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8387 Y 2
SFX 8387 ėkšti ėkšti/13331,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8387 ėkštis ėkštis/13331,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8388 Y 2
SFX 8388 ėkšti ėkšti/13330,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8388 ėkštis ėkštis/13330,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8399 Y 4
SFX 8399 ėkšti eškia/15037,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8399 ėkštis eškiasi/15037,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8399 ėkšti ėškia/15037,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8399 ėkštis ėškiasi/15037,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8400 Y 4
SFX 8400 ėkšti eškia/15666,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8400 ėkštis eškiasi/15666,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8400 ėkšti ėškia/15666,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8400 ėkštis ėškiasi/15666,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8401 Y 4
SFX 8401 ėkšti eškia/15677,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8401 ėkštis eškiasi/15677,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8401 ėkšti ėškia/15677,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8401 ėkštis ėškiasi/15677,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8402 Y 4
SFX 8402 ėkšti eškia/15676,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8402 ėkštis eškiasi/15676,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8402 ėkšti ėškia/15676,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8402 ėkštis ėškiasi/15676,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8403 Y 4
SFX 8403 ėkšti eškia/15586,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8403 ėkštis eškiasi/15586,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8403 ėkšti ėškia/15586,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8403 ėkštis ėškiasi/15586,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8404 Y 4
SFX 8404 ėkšti eškia/15595,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8404 ėkštis eškiasi/15595,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8404 ėkšti ėškia/15595,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8404 ėkštis ėškiasi/15595,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8405 Y 4
SFX 8405 ėkšti eškia/15594,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8405 ėkštis eškiasi/15594,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8405 ėkšti ėškia/15594,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8405 ėkštis ėškiasi/15594,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8406 Y 4
SFX 8406 ėkšti eškia/15146,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8406 ėkštis eškiasi/15146,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8406 ėkšti ėškia/15146,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8406 ėkštis ėškiasi/15146,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8407 Y 4
SFX 8407 ėkšti eškia/15145,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8407 ėkštis eškiasi/15145,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8407 ėkšti ėškia/15145,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8407 ėkštis ėškiasi/15145,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8435 Y 2
SFX 8435 ėkšti eškie/17067,9998 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8435 ėkšti ėškie/17067,9998 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8436 Y 2
SFX 8436 ėkštis eškie/17068,9998 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8436 ėkštis ėškie/17068,9998 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8439 Y 2
SFX 8439 ėkšti ėškė/17069,9999 .	is:PsForm
SFX 8439 ėkštis ėškėsi/17069,9999 .	is:PsForm

SFX 8440 Y 2
SFX 8440 ėkšti ėškė/17134,9999 .	is:PsForm
SFX 8440 ėkštis ėškėsi/17134,9999 .	is:PsForm

SFX 8441 Y 2
SFX 8441 ėkšti ėškė/17133,9999 .	is:PsForm
SFX 8441 ėkštis ėškėsi/17133,9999 .	is:PsForm

SFX 8445 Y 2
SFX 8445 gzti gzti/13314,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8445 gztis gztis/13314,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8446 Y 2
SFX 8446 gzti gzti/13941,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8446 gztis gztis/13941,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8447 Y 2
SFX 8447 gzti gzti/13486,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8447 gztis gztis/13486,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8448 Y 2
SFX 8448 gzti gzti/13497,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8448 gztis gztis/13497,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8449 Y 2
SFX 8449 gzti gzti/13496,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8449 gztis gztis/13496,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8450 Y 2
SFX 8450 gzti gzti/13406,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8450 gztis gztis/13406,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8451 Y 2
SFX 8451 gzti gzti/13415,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8451 gztis gztis/13415,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8452 Y 2
SFX 8452 gzti gzti/13414,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8452 gztis gztis/13414,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8453 Y 2
SFX 8453 gzti gzti/13331,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8453 gztis gztis/13331,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8454 Y 2
SFX 8454 gzti gzti/13330,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8454 gztis gztis/13330,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8465 Y 2
SFX 8465 gzti zga/15037,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8465 gztis zgasi/15037,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8466 Y 2
SFX 8466 gzti zga/15666,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8466 gztis zgasi/15666,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8467 Y 2
SFX 8467 gzti zga/15677,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8467 gztis zgasi/15677,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8468 Y 2
SFX 8468 gzti zga/15676,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8468 gztis zgasi/15676,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8469 Y 2
SFX 8469 gzti zga/15586,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8469 gztis zgasi/15586,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8470 Y 2
SFX 8470 gzti zga/15595,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8470 gztis zgasi/15595,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8471 Y 2
SFX 8471 gzti zga/15594,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8471 gztis zgasi/15594,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8472 Y 2
SFX 8472 gzti zga/15146,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8472 gztis zgasi/15146,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8473 Y 2
SFX 8473 gzti zga/15145,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8473 gztis zgasi/15145,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8483 Y 1
SFX 8483 gzti zgie/17067,9998 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8484 Y 1
SFX 8484 gztis zgie/17068,9998 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8485 Y 2
SFX 8485 gzti zgė/17069,9999 .	is:PsForm
SFX 8485 gztis zgėsi/17069,9999 .	is:PsForm

SFX 8486 Y 2
SFX 8486 gzti zgė/17134,9999 .	is:PsForm
SFX 8486 gztis zgėsi/17134,9999 .	is:PsForm

SFX 8487 Y 2
SFX 8487 gzti zgė/17133,9999 .	is:PsForm
SFX 8487 gztis zgėsi/17133,9999 .	is:PsForm

SFX 8491 Y 2
SFX 8491 ilti ilti/13314,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8491 iltis iltis/13314,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8492 Y 2
SFX 8492 ilti ilti/13941,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8492 iltis iltis/13941,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8493 Y 2
SFX 8493 ilti ilti/13486,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8493 iltis iltis/13486,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8494 Y 2
SFX 8494 ilti ilti/13497,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8494 iltis iltis/13497,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8495 Y 2
SFX 8495 ilti ilti/13496,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8495 iltis iltis/13496,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8496 Y 2
SFX 8496 ilti ilti/13406,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8496 iltis iltis/13406,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8497 Y 2
SFX 8497 ilti ilti/13415,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8497 iltis iltis/13415,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8498 Y 2
SFX 8498 ilti ilti/13414,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8498 iltis iltis/13414,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8499 Y 2
SFX 8499 ilti ilti/13331,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8499 iltis iltis/13331,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8500 Y 2
SFX 8500 ilti ilti/13330,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8500 iltis iltis/13330,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8511 Y 2
SFX 8511 ilti ila/15037,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8511 iltis ilasi/15037,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8512 Y 2
SFX 8512 ilti ila/15666,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8512 iltis ilasi/15666,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8513 Y 2
SFX 8513 ilti ila/15677,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8513 iltis ilasi/15677,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8514 Y 2
SFX 8514 ilti ila/15676,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8514 iltis ilasi/15676,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8515 Y 2
SFX 8515 ilti ila/15586,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8515 iltis ilasi/15586,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8516 Y 2
SFX 8516 ilti ila/15595,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8516 iltis ilasi/15595,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8517 Y 2
SFX 8517 ilti ila/15594,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8517 iltis ilasi/15594,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8518 Y 2
SFX 8518 ilti ila/15146,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8518 iltis ilasi/15146,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8519 Y 2
SFX 8519 ilti ila/15145,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8519 iltis ilasi/15145,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8529 Y 1
SFX 8529 ilti ilie/17067,9998 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8530 Y 1
SFX 8530 iltis ilie/17068,9998 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8531 Y 2
SFX 8531 ilti ylė/17069,9999 .	is:PsForm
SFX 8531 iltis ylėsi/17069,9999 .	is:PsForm

SFX 8532 Y 2
SFX 8532 ilti ylė/17134,9999 .	is:PsForm
SFX 8532 iltis ylėsi/17134,9999 .	is:PsForm

SFX 8533 Y 2
SFX 8533 ilti ylė/17133,9999 .	is:PsForm
SFX 8533 iltis ylėsi/17133,9999 .	is:PsForm

SFX 8537 Y 2
SFX 8537 ūsti ūsti/13314,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8537 ūstis ūstis/13314,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8538 Y 2
SFX 8538 ūsti ūsti/13941,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8538 ūstis ūstis/13941,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8539 Y 2
SFX 8539 ūsti ūsti/13486,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8539 ūstis ūstis/13486,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8540 Y 2
SFX 8540 ūsti ūsti/13497,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8540 ūstis ūstis/13497,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8541 Y 2
SFX 8541 ūsti ūsti/13496,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8541 ūstis ūstis/13496,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8542 Y 2
SFX 8542 ūsti ūsti/13406,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8542 ūstis ūstis/13406,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8543 Y 2
SFX 8543 ūsti ūsti/13415,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8543 ūstis ūstis/13415,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8544 Y 2
SFX 8544 ūsti ūsti/13414,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8544 ūstis ūstis/13414,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8545 Y 2
SFX 8545 ūsti ūsti/13331,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8545 ūstis ūstis/13331,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8546 Y 2
SFX 8546 ūsti ūsti/13330,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8546 ūstis ūstis/13330,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8557 Y 2
SFX 8557 ūsti učia/15037,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8557 ūstis učiasi/15037,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8558 Y 2
SFX 8558 ūsti učia/15666,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8558 ūstis učiasi/15666,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8559 Y 2
SFX 8559 ūsti učia/15677,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8559 ūstis učiasi/15677,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8560 Y 2
SFX 8560 ūsti učia/15676,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8560 ūstis učiasi/15676,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8561 Y 2
SFX 8561 ūsti učia/15586,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8561 ūstis učiasi/15586,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8562 Y 2
SFX 8562 ūsti učia/15595,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8562 ūstis učiasi/15595,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8563 Y 2
SFX 8563 ūsti učia/15594,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8563 ūstis učiasi/15594,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8564 Y 2
SFX 8564 ūsti učia/15146,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8564 ūstis učiasi/15146,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8565 Y 2
SFX 8565 ūsti učia/15145,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8565 ūstis učiasi/15145,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8575 Y 1
SFX 8575 ūsti utie/17067,9998 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8576 Y 1
SFX 8576 ūstis utie/17068,9998 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8577 Y 2
SFX 8577 ūsti ūtė/17069,9999 .	is:PsForm
SFX 8577 ūstis ūtėsi/17069,9999 .	is:PsForm

SFX 8578 Y 2
SFX 8578 ūsti ūtė/17134,9999 .	is:PsForm
SFX 8578 ūstis ūtėsi/17134,9999 .	is:PsForm

SFX 8579 Y 2
SFX 8579 ūsti ūtė/17133,9999 .	is:PsForm
SFX 8579 ūstis ūtėsi/17133,9999 .	is:PsForm

SFX 8583 Y 2
SFX 8583 ežti ežti/13314,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8583 ežtis ežtis/13314,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8584 Y 2
SFX 8584 ežti ežti/13941,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8584 ežtis ežtis/13941,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8585 Y 2
SFX 8585 ežti ežti/13486,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8585 ežtis ežtis/13486,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8586 Y 2
SFX 8586 ežti ežti/13497,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8586 ežtis ežtis/13497,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8587 Y 2
SFX 8587 ežti ežti/13496,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8587 ežtis ežtis/13496,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8588 Y 2
SFX 8588 ežti ežti/13406,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8588 ežtis ežtis/13406,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8589 Y 2
SFX 8589 ežti ežti/13415,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8589 ežtis ežtis/13415,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8590 Y 2
SFX 8590 ežti ežti/13414,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8590 ežtis ežtis/13414,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8591 Y 2
SFX 8591 ežti ežti/13331,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8591 ežtis ežtis/13331,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8592 Y 2
SFX 8592 ežti ežti/13330,9999 .	is:IForm
SFX 8592 ežtis ežtis/13330,9999 .	is:IForm

SFX 8603 Y 2
SFX 8603 ežti ęžta/15037,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8603 ežtis ęžtasi/15037,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8604 Y 2
SFX 8604 ežti ęžta/15666,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8604 ežtis ęžtasi/15666,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8605 Y 2
SFX 8605 ežti ęžta/15677,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8605 ežtis ęžtasi/15677,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8606 Y 2
SFX 8606 ežti ęžta/15676,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8606 ežtis ęžtasi/15676,9999 .	is:PrForm

SFX 8607 Y 2
SFX 8607 ežti ęžta/15586,9999 .	is:PrForm
SFX 8607 ežtis ęžtasi/15586,9999 .	is:PrForm
